Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.240

Limit of time for decision.

Every case submitted to a judge of a superior court for his or her decision shall be decided by him or her within ninety days from the submission thereof: PROVIDED, That if within said period of ninety days a rehearing shall have been ordered, then the period within which he or she is to decide shall commence at the time the cause is submitted upon such rehearing, and upon willful failure of any such judge so to do, he or she shall be deemed to have forfeited his or her office.

[ 2011 c 336 s 21; 1890 p 344 s 12; RRS s 39.]

NOTES:

Decisions, when to be made: State Constitution Art. 4 s 20.

Payment of county's portion: RCW 2.08.100.